Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB916.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of November 3, 2022 (P.L.2135, No.150), known as the Childhood Blood Lead Test Act, is amended by adding paragraphs to read:Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds that:* * *(8) No safe blood lead level in children has been identified.<--123456789101112131415161718192021 (9) The effects of lead poisoning are not reversible.Section 2. Section 4 of the act is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 4. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Birthing facility." An inpatient or ambulatory health care facility licensed by the department that provides birthing and newborn care services."Blood lead level." A measure of lead in the blood, measured in micrograms of lead per deciliter of whole blood (µg/dL).* * *"Child." A child younger than 72 months of age who is a resident of this Commonwealth.* * *"Diagnostic blood lead level testing." An analysis of a blood sample to determine blood lead levels for the sample, which is obtained by venipuncture or capillary blood sampling for the purpose of any of the following:(1) Confirming lead poisoning as a follow-up blood lead level test.(2) Diagnosing a child or pregnant woman showing signs or symptoms of lead poisoning.(3) Diagnosing a child or pregnant woman suspected of having sustained a significant lead exposure."Diagnostic evaluation." Obtaining and evaluating medical history information, conducting a physical examination and diagnostic blood lead level testing, identifying potential sources of lead exposure and evaluating iron status.20250HB0916PN3286 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 * * *"Lead poisoning." A blood lead level that meets one of the following criteria:(1) A confirmed blood lead level greater than or equal to 20 µg/dL in a child or pregnant woman.(2) Two blood lead level samples of a child or pregnant woman, separated by at least 90 days, but not more than 365 days, which indicate a blood lead level greater than or equal to 15 µg/dL."Lead-screening-related services." Any of the following:(1) Materials and supplies used to obtain blood specimens for quantitative blood lead level or erythrocyte protoporphyrin analysis.(2) Laboratory analysis of submitted samples for quantitative blood lead level testing or erythrocyte protoporphyrin analysis.(3) Evaluation of results obtained from laboratory analysis of samples submitted for quantitative blood lead level or erythrocyte protoporphyrin analysis, as well as related consultation, referral and follow-up of children and pregnant women who potentially have lead poisoning."Screening test." A blood sample obtained by venipuncture or capillary blood sampling from an asymptomatic child or pregnant woman not known to have lead poisoning to identify risk of lead poisoning for the child or pregnant woman.Section 3. Section 5 of the act is repealed:[Section 5. Lead poisoning prevention, assessment and testing.(a) Lead testing for children.--(1) The following apply:(i) A health care provider shall consider possible 20250HB0916PN3286 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lead exposure in an individual patient by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics by 24 months of age.(ii) If a patient has never been tested in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics by 24 months of age, a health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure and perform blood lead testing in an individual patient between 24 months and 72 months of age.(iii) A health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a patient's parent or legal guardian understands the risks and benefits of blood lead testing prior to obtaining consent.(2) If a patient's parent or legal guardian consents to blood lead testing for the patient under paragraph (1) and the results of a capillary blood lead test indicate an elevated blood lead level, the health care provider shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test by venipuncture within 12 weeks of the first blood lead test after obtaining the consent of the patient's parent or legal guardian.(b) Lead exposure risk assessment and testing requirements for pregnant women.--A health care provider shall consider possible lead exposure in individual pregnant women by evaluating risk factors for lead exposure and perform blood lead testing if a single risk factor is identified in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American College of Obstetricians and 20250HB0916PN3286 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Gynecologists.(c) Reporting.--Health care providers and laboratories shall comply with reporting regulations as specified in 28 Pa. Code § 27.34 (relating to reporting cases of lead poisoning).]Section 4. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 5.1. Lead poisoning prevention, assessment and testing.(a) Lead testing requirements for children.--(1) A health care provider or certified assistant of a health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a child under the health care provider's care receives at least one blood lead test by 24 months of age or between the ages of 24 through 72 months of age if the child has never been tested in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics.(2) If the results of a blood lead test under paragraph (1) indicate an elevated blood lead level, the health care provider or certified assistant of the health care provider shall perform a confirmatory blood lead test on the child within 12 weeks of the first blood lead test.(3) A health care provider or certified assistant of a health care provider shall perform a screening test for a child under the health care provider's care who is designated as high risk through a risk assessment evaluation promulgated by the department on an annual basis from 12 months of age to 72 months of age.(4) Upon recommendation by a health care provider, a health care provider or certified assistant of a health care provider may perform frequent screening tests on an asymptomatic child under the health care provider's care who 20250HB0916PN3286 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 is younger than 72 months of age.(b) Lead testing requirements for pregnant women.--A health care provider or certified assistant of a health care provider shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that a pregnant woman under the health care provider's care receives at least one blood lead test as part of the pregnant woman's prenatal care.(c) Testing methods.--Health care providers shall ensure that screening tests are conducted by venipuncture or capillary blood sampling in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.(d) Reporting.--Health care providers and laboratories shall comply with reporting regulations as specified in 28 Pa. Code § 27.34 (relating to reporting cases of lead poisoning).(e) Nonapplicability.--If a child's parent or legal guardian or a pregnant woman receiving prenatal care objects in writing to a blood lead test on religious grounds or on the basis of a strong moral or ethical conviction similar to a religious belief, a health care provider or certified assistant of the health care provider shall perform a diagnostic evaluation in the least invasive manner practicable.Section 5. Section 6(b)(1) of the act is amended, the subsection is amended by adding paragraphs and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 6. Duties of department.* * *(b) Distribution of literature about childhood lead poisoning.--(1) The department shall provide culturally and linguistically appropriate educational materials regarding childhood lead poisoning, the risk factors associated with 20250HB0916PN3286 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 lead exposure, the importance of assessments and testing for elevated lead levels, prevention of childhood lead poisoning, treatment of childhood lead poisoning, remediation and, when appropriate, the requirements of this act.* * *(3) A hospital, birthing facility or health care provider shall provide the information under subsection (a) and the educational materials under this subsection without cost to a parent of a newborn prior to discharge from the hospital or birthing facility or, if childbirth occurs in a setting other than a hospital or birthing facility, by a health care provider who assists the parent during childbirth.(4) A parent of a newborn prior to discharge from a hospital or birthing facility, or after a childbirth that takes place in a setting other than a hospital or birthing facility, shall sign an acknowledgment statement in a form determined by the department that the parent received the information under subsection (a) and the educational materials under this subsection. A hospital, birthing facility or health care provider shall provide a copy of the acknowledgment statement to the parent and keep another copy of the acknowledgment statement on file at the hospital, birthing facility or setting other than a hospital or birthing facility, as applicable.(c) Liability.--A hospital, birthing facility or health care provider shall not be civilly or criminally liable for the action or inaction of a parent with regard to lead exposure based on the information under subsection (a) and the educational materials under subsection (b).20250HB0916PN3286 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 6. Section 7(a) of the act is amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 7. Blood lead assessment and testing coverage.(a) [General rule] Coverage.--A health insurance policy or government program covered under this section shall provide to covered individuals or recipients [blood lead tests as follows:(1) In the case of individuals or recipients who are pregnant, one blood lead test per pregnancy if a single risk factor is identified in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists.(2) In the case of individuals or recipients who are under two years of age, at least one blood lead test by 24 months of age in accordance with recommendations from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the American Academy of Pediatrics and, if the result of the blood level test indicates an elevated blood lead level, another blood lead test by venipuncture within 12 weeks of the blood level test in which the elevated blood lead level was indicated.] coverage for all of the following:(3) Screening tests and lead-screening-related services for children younger than 72 months of age and pregnant women.(4) Diagnostic evaluations. (a.1) Services.--The department shall provide the following services for children younger than 72 months of age and pregnant women who are not covered by a health insurance policy:(1) Screening tests and lead-screening-related services.(2) Diagnostic evaluations.(a.2) Reimbursement.--The department shall not be required 20250HB0916PN3286 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to reimburse a third party for services under subsection (b) that are not provided by the department.* * *Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 3, 2022 (P.L.2135, NO.150), ENTITLED "AN ACT PROVIDING FOR BLOOD LEAD ASSESSMENT AND TESTING OF CERTAIN CHILDREN AND PREGNANT WOMEN BY HEALTH CARE PROVIDERS; IMPOSING DUTIES ON THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; AND REQUIRING CERTAIN HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES TO COVER BLOOD LEAD TESTS," FURTHER PROVIDING FOR TITLE OF ACT, FOR LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE, FOR DEFINITIONS, FOR LEAD POISONING PREVENTION, ASSESSMENT AND TESTING, FOR DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT AND FOR BLOOD LEAD ASSESSMENT AND TESTING COVERAGE.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. THE TITLE OF THE ACT OF NOVEMBER 3, 2022 (P.L.2135, NO.150), KNOWN AS THE CHILDHOOD BLOOD LEAD TEST ACT, IS AMENDED TO READ:AN ACTPROVIDING FOR BLOOD LEAD ASSESSMENT AND TESTING OF CERTAIN CHILDREN AND PREGNANT WOMEN BY HEALTH CARE [PROVIDERS] PRACTITIONERS; IMPOSING DUTIES ON THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH; AND REQUIRING CERTAIN HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES TO COVER BLOOD LEAD TESTS.SECTION 2. SECTION 3(3) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 3. LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE.THE PURPOSES OF THIS ACT ARE:* * *(3) TO [ENCOURAGE] REQUIRE THE TESTING OF ALL CHILDREN IN THIS COMMONWEALTH BY TWO YEARS OF AGE SO THAT PROMPT DIAGNOSIS AND TREATMENT, AS WELL AS THE PREVENTION OF HARM, ARE POSSIBLE.SECTION 3. SECTION 4 OF THE ACT IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:20250HB0916PN3286 - 9 - <--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031323334 SECTION 4. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS ACT SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER." AS DEFINED IN SECTION 103 OF THE ACT OF JULY 19, 1979 (P.L.130, NO.48), KNOWN AS THE HEALTH CARE FACILITIES ACT.* * *SECTION 4. SECTIONS 5, 6(A) AND (B)(2) AND 7(A) AND (B) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:SECTION 5. LEAD POISONING PREVENTION, ASSESSMENT AND TESTING REQUIREMENTS.[(A) LEAD TESTING FOR CHILDREN.--(1) THE FOLLOWING APPLY:(I) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL CONSIDER POSSIBLE LEAD EXPOSURE IN AN INDIVIDUAL PATIENT BY EVALUATING RISK FACTORS FOR LEAD EXPOSURE AND PERFORM BLOOD LEAD TESTING IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION AND THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS BY 24 MONTHS OF AGE.(II) IF A PATIENT HAS NEVER BEEN TESTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION AND THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS BY 24 MONTHS OF AGE, A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL CONSIDER POSSIBLE LEAD EXPOSURE AND PERFORM BLOOD LEAD TESTING IN AN INDIVIDUAL PATIENT BETWEEN 24 MONTHS AND 72 MONTHS OF AGE.(III) A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT A PATIENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL 20250HB0916PN3286 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 GUARDIAN UNDERSTANDS THE RISKS AND BENEFITS OF BLOOD LEAD TESTING PRIOR TO OBTAINING CONSENT.(2) IF A PATIENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN CONSENTS TO BLOOD LEAD TESTING FOR THE PATIENT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) AND THE RESULTS OF A CAPILLARY BLOOD LEAD TEST INDICATE AN ELEVATED BLOOD LEAD LEVEL, THE HEALTH CARE PROVIDER SHALL PERFORM A CONFIRMATORY BLOOD LEAD TEST BY VENIPUNCTURE WITHIN 12 WEEKS OF THE FIRST BLOOD LEAD TEST AFTER OBTAINING THE CONSENT OF THE PATIENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN.](A.1) LEAD TESTING REQUIREMENTS FOR CHILDREN.--(1) A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT A PATIENT UNDER THE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER'S CARE RECEIVES AT LEAST ONE BLOOD LEAD TEST BY 12 MONTHS OF AGE AND A SECOND BLOOD LEAD TEST BY 24 MONTHS OF AGE.(2) IF A PATIENT HAS NEVER BEEN TESTED BY 24 MONTHS OF AGE, A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER SHALL ENSURE THAT THE PATIENT RECEIVES AT LEAST ONE BLOOD LEAD TEST BETWEEN 24 MONTHS AND 72 MONTHS OF AGE.(3) IF A CAPILLARY BLOOD LEAD TEST INDICATES AN ELEVATED BLOOD LEAD LEVEL, A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER SHALL PERFORM A CONFIRMATORY BLOOD LEAD TEST BY VENIPUNCTURE IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION.(B) LEAD EXPOSURE RISK ASSESSMENT AND TESTING REQUIREMENTS FOR PREGNANT WOMEN.--A HEALTH CARE [PROVIDER] PRACTITIONER SHALL CONSIDER POSSIBLE LEAD EXPOSURE IN INDIVIDUAL PREGNANT WOMEN BY EVALUATING RISK FACTORS FOR LEAD EXPOSURE AND PERFORM BLOOD LEAD TESTING IF A SINGLE RISK FACTOR IS IDENTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND 20250HB0916PN3286 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PREVENTION AND THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS.(C) REPORTING.--HEALTH CARE [PROVIDERS] PRACTITIONERS AND LABORATORIES SHALL COMPLY WITH REPORTING REGULATIONS AS SPECIFIED IN 28 PA. CODE § 27.34 (RELATING TO REPORTING CASES OF LEAD POISONING).(D) COMMUNICATION OF RISKS AND BENEFITS.--NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (E), A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER SHALL MAKE REASONABLE EFFORTS TO ENSURE THAT A CHILD'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN, OR A WOMAN UNDER PRENATAL CARE, UNDERSTANDS THE BENEFITS AND RISKS OF A BLOOD LEAD TEST.(E) NONAPPLICABILITY.--THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL NOT APPLY IF A CHILD'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN, OR A WOMAN UNDER PRENATAL CARE, OBJECTS TO THE BLOOD LEAD TEST FOR ANY REASON. A HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER SHALL DOCUMENT THE OBJECTION IN WRITING AND INCLUDE THE OBJECTION IN THE PATIENT'S MEDICAL RECORD. BEFORE PERFORMING A BLOOD LEAD TEST UNDER THIS SECTION, THE HEALTH CARE PRACTITIONER SHALL NOTIFY THE CHILD'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN, OR THE WOMAN UNDER PRENATAL CARE, OF THE OPTION TO OBJECT TO A BLOOD LEAD TEST.SECTION 6. DUTIES OF DEPARTMENT.(A) COMPREHENSIVE EDUCATIONAL PROGRAM.--THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT A PUBLIC INFORMATION CAMPAIGN TO INFORM PARENTS OF YOUNG CHILDREN, PHYSICIANS, NURSES AND OTHER HEALTH CARE [PROVIDERS] PRACTITIONERS OF THE LEAD ASSESSMENT AND TESTING REQUIREMENTS OF THIS ACT.(B) DISTRIBUTION OF LITERATURE ABOUT CHILDHOOD LEAD POISONING.--* * *(2) EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS SHALL BE AVAILABLE AT NO COST 20250HB0916PN3286 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 AND SHALL BE DEVELOPED FOR SPECIFIC AUDIENCES, INCLUDING HEALTH CARE [PROVIDERS] PRACTITIONERS, HOMEOWNERS, LANDLORDS AND PARENTS OR CAREGIVERS.SECTION 7. BLOOD LEAD ASSESSMENT AND TESTING COVERAGE.(A) GENERAL RULE.--A HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY OR GOVERNMENT PROGRAM COVERED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE TO COVERED INDIVIDUALS OR RECIPIENTS BLOOD LEAD TESTS AS FOLLOWS:(1) IN THE CASE OF INDIVIDUALS OR RECIPIENTS WHO ARE PREGNANT, ONE BLOOD LEAD TEST PER PREGNANCY [IF A SINGLE RISK FACTOR IS IDENTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION AND THE AMERICAN COLLEGE OF OBSTETRICIANS AND GYNECOLOGISTS].(2) IN THE CASE OF INDIVIDUALS OR RECIPIENTS WHO ARE:(I) UNDER TWO YEARS OF AGE, AT LEAST [ONE BLOOD LEAD TEST] TWO BLOOD LEAD TESTS BY 24 MONTHS OF AGE IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION AND THE AMERICAN ACADEMY OF PEDIATRICS [AND, IF]; AND(II) BETWEEN 24 MONTHS OF AGE AND 72 MONTHS OF AGE, AT LEAST ONE BLOOD LEAD TEST BY 72 MONTHS OF AGE IF THE INDIVIDUAL OR RECIPIENT HAS NEVER BEEN TESTED BY 24 MONTHS OF AGE.(3) IF THE RESULT OF THE BLOOD [LEVEL] LEAD TEST COVERED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OR (2) INDICATES AN ELEVATED BLOOD LEAD LEVEL, ANOTHER BLOOD LEAD TEST BY VENIPUNCTURE [WITHIN 12 WEEKS OF THE BLOOD LEVEL TEST IN WHICH THE ELEVATED BLOOD LEAD LEVEL WAS INDICATED.] IN ACCORDANCE WITH RECOMMENDATIONS FROM THE CENTERS FOR DISEASE CONTROL AND PREVENTION.(B) COPAYMENTS, DEDUCTIBLES AND COINSURANCE.--COVERAGE UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE SUBJECT TO [COPAYMENT, DEDUCTIBLE AND 20250HB0916PN3286 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 COINSURANCE PROVISIONS AND ANY OTHER GENERAL EXCLUSIONS OR LIMITATIONS OF A HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY OR GOVERNMENT PROGRAM TO THE SAME EXTENT AS OTHER MEDICAL SERVICES COVERED BY THE POLICY OR PROGRAM ARE SUBJECT TO THESE PROVISIONS.] THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE APPLICABLE HEALTH INSURANCE POLICY.* * *SECTION 5. THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 7(A) AND (B) OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY AS FOLLOWS:(1) FOR HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES FOR WHICH EITHER RATES OR FORMS ARE REQUIRED TO BE FILED WITH THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT OR THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 7 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO ANY POLICY FOR WHICH A FORM OR RATE IS FIRST FILED ON OR AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.(2) FOR HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES FOR WHICH NEITHER RATES NOR FORMS ARE REQUIRED TO BE FILED WITH THE INSURANCE DEPARTMENT OR THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE AMENDMENT OF SECTION 7 OF THE ACT SHALL APPLY TO ANY POLICY ISSUED OR RENEWED ON OR AFTER 180 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION.SECTION 6. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB0916PN3286 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021